Nebraska, session 109, LB238.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB238 LB238
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-1304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-1304 (1) There shall be local foster care review boards to
conduct the foster care file audit case reviews of children in foster
care placement and carry out other powers and duties given to such boards
under the Foster Care Review Act.
(2) The executive director of the office shall select members to
serve on local boards from a list of applications submitted to the
office. Each local board shall consist of not less than four and not more
than ten members as determined by the executive director. The members of
the local board shall reasonably represent the various social, economic,
racial, and ethnic groups of the county or counties from which its
members may be appointed. A person employed by the office, the Department
of Health and Human Services, a residential child-caring agency, a child-
placing agency, or a court shall not be appointed to a local board. A
list of the members of each local board shall be sent to the department
and the Office of Probation Administration.
(3) Local boards shall not be public bodies for purposes of the Open
Meetings Act.
Sec. 2. Section 43-1308, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-1308 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Indian
Child Welfare Act, the designated local board shall:
(a) Conduct a foster care file audit case review at least once every
six months for the case of each child in a foster care placement to
determine what efforts have been made to carry out the plan or permanency
plan for rehabilitation of the foster child and family unit or for
permanent placement of such child pursuant to section 43-1312;
(b) Submit to the court having jurisdiction over such child for the
purposes of foster care placement, within thirty days after the foster
care file audit case review, its findings and recommendations regarding
-2-

LB238 LB238
2025 2025
the efforts and progress made to carry out the plan or permanency plan
established pursuant to section 43-1312 together with any other
recommendations it chooses to make regarding the child. The findings and
recommendations shall include whether there is a need for continued out-
of-home placement, whether the current placement is safe and appropriate,
the specific reasons for the findings and recommendations, including
factors, opinions, and rationale considered in the foster care file audit
case review, whether the grounds for termination of parental rights under
section 43-292 appear to exist, and the date of the next foster care file
audit case review by the designated local board;
(c) If the return of the child to his or her parents is not likely,
recommend referral for adoption and termination of parental rights,
guardianship, placement with a relative, or, as a last resort, another
planned, permanent living arrangement; and
(d) Promote and encourage stability and continuity in foster care by
discouraging unnecessary changes in the placement of foster children and
by encouraging the recruitment of foster parents who may be eligible as
adoptive parents.
(2) When the office or designated local board determines that the
interests of a child in a foster care placement would be served thereby,
the office or designated local board may request a court review hearing
as provided for in section 43-1313.
(3) Due to the confidential and protected nature of child-specific
and family-specific information regarding mental and behavioral health
services, if such information is discussed at a local board meeting or a
portion of a meeting, the portion of the meeting at which such
information is discussed shall be exempt from the Open Meetings Act.
Sec. 3. Original sections 43-1304 and 43-1308, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 4. The following section is outright repealed: Section
43-1306, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024.
-3-